Massachusetts, session 194th, S2205.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended in section 20 by striking out paragraph (d).
SECTION 2. Said chapter 30A, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting
after section 20 the following section:-
Section 20A. (a) A public body may allow remote participation by any member for any
meeting of the public body. For the purposes of this section, the term remote participation means
participation by a member of a public body during a meeting of that public body where the
member is not physically present at the meeting location.
of 3

(b) Members remotely participating in a meeting may vote, shall be considered present
and in attendance for all purposes, including for purposes of determining a quorum and for the
purposes of section 23D of chapter 39.
(c) All members of the public body participating either remotely or at a meeting location
shall be clearly audible to one another.
(d) For any meeting conducted with remote participation, the public body shall make
provisions to ensure public access to the deliberations of the public body for interested members
of the public through adequate, alternative means. Adequate, alternative means of public access
shall mean measures that provide transparency and permit timely and effective public access to
the virtual meeting. Such means may include, without limitation, providing public access
through telephone, Internet or satellite enabled audio or video conferencing or any other
technology that enables the public to clearly follow the proceedings of the meeting while the
proceedings are occurring. Documents used for any such meeting should be made available to
the public before or at the time of the meeting of the public body. Where allowance for active,
real-time participation by members of the public is a specific requirement of a general or special
law or regulation, or a charter, local ordinance or by-law, pursuant to which the proceeding is
conducted, any alternative means of public access shall provide for such participation. A public
body shall offer its selected alternative means of public access to meetings with remote
participation without subscription, toll, or similar charge to the public.
(e) A public body that elects to conduct its proceedings with remote participation shall
ensure that any party entitled or required to appear before it may do so through remote means, as
if the party were a member of the public body participating remotely.
of 3

(f) The executive body of a municipality shall develop and adopt standards and
guidelines for remote participation of public bodies that is sufficient for the municipality prior to
any meeting with remote participation held pursuant to this section.
of 3